src-fst-stems-pronouns.lexc.md
# South Saami pronouns





The **Pronoun** lexicon points to all the subgrops, presented in this order below:

* Reciprocal ;    
* Personal ;	    
* Demonstrative ; 
* Interrogative ; 
* Indefinite ;    
* Reflexive ;	    





## The Reciprocal pronoun


* sinsitniem+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Acc:sinsitniem FINAL1 ;          
* ...



## Personal pronouns


Splitting in 1st, 2nd, 3rd


New lemma form, now number as baseform, due to Oahpa



### Lexica for sg

the **firstperspronsg** for first pers has special consonantism

for **nonfirstperspronsg** the 2nd and 3rd are identical


### Lexica for du

* LEXICON firstpersprondu  

* LEXICON nonfirstpersprondu  


### Lexica for pl

* LEXICON perspronpl  


### Common case lexica


* LEXICON longproncase  


### dïhte
**DIHTE**  is a personal pronoun,
demonstrative dïhte is treated below.









## Demonstrative pronouns

This is for:
the attributive forms of dïhte
all forms of the other pronouns

### The initial demonstrative lexica

* LEXICON Demonstrative   
Same as above, with exceptions in
Sg Ill, Sg Ine, Sg Ela, Pl Com
Still open: analyse morphologically or not...

















* LEXICON DAGKERES    






## Interrogative and relative pronouns

















## Indefinite pronouns

* LEXICON Indefinite   









































* LEXICON indeven-e 

* LEXICON indeven-a 


## kongruensContlex

### muvhtiecase

* LEXICON muvhtiecase 

* LEXICON muvhtiesg 

* LEXICON muvhtiepl 


### naaken

* LEXICON naakenlex 


* LEXICON indodd   

* LEXICON indsg_odd  

* LEXICON indpl_odd  

* LEXICON indess_odd  



* LEXICON ind_noninfl  



### Inflecting even indefinites

* LEXICON indsg-e  



* LEXICON indsg-a  



* LEXICON indpl-e  

* LEXICON indpl-a  


* LEXICON indess  


* LEXICON indcoll   









## Reflexive pronouns


* LEXICON Reflexive 




* LEXICON OBLREFL 























* LEXICON OBLREFL-NONPAL  










* LEXICON OBLREFL-NONPAL2 









* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-sma/blob/main/../src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc)</small>
